California, session 20252026, SB502.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Part 13.5 (commencing with Section 53569) is added to Division 31 of the Health and Safety Code, to read:PART 13.5. Affordable Housing Development on Local Education Agency-Owned Land53569. (a) A local education agency may submit a list of any available local education agency-owned land to the department for purposes of determining the suitability for development of affordable housing.(b) The department, in consultation with the Department of General Services, shall conduct a review of the local education agency-owned land submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) and determine the suitability of the land for the development of affordable housing, consistent with the established criteria developed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 14684.3 of the Government Code.(c) Any local education agency-owned land determined to be suitable for the development of affordable housing pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be made publicly available through both of the following:(1) The digitized inventory created pursuant to Executive Order No. N-06-19.(2) The contact list of housing sponsors that have notified the department of their interest in surplus land pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 54222 of the Government Code.(d) An affordable housing development constructed on local education agency-owned land determined to be suitable for the development of affordable housing pursuant to subdivision (b) shall provide school district employees and local tenants with a right of first refusal to occupy the housing. School district employees shall be prioritized before local tenants.